Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1406] Department of education
federal revenue maximization program revolving fund; established. (a)
There is established in the state treasury the department of education federal
revenue maximization program revolving fund to be administered by the
department. Moneys from the revolving fund shall be expended by the department
for medicaid-eligible services provided by the department and administrative
costs related to the department of education federal revenue maximization
program.

(b) The department of education federal
revenue maximization program revolving fund shall consist of:

(1) Federal revenue collected by the department for
administering and operating the department of education federal revenue
maximization program;

(2) Legislative appropriations;

(3) All interest earned on the deposit or investment
of moneys in the department of education federal revenue maximization program
revolving fund; and

(4) Any other moneys made available to the department
of education federal revenue maximization program revolving fund from other
sources. [L 2006, c 244, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next